Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3015.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 5046XC (2) 91 jda/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 256.146, subsection 16, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 16. a. Adopt rules to require that a background 3 investigation be conducted by the division of criminal 4 investigation of the department of public safety on all initial 5 applicants for licensure. The board shall also require all 6 initial applicants to submit a completed fingerprint packet and 7 shall use the packet to facilitate a national criminal history 8 background check. 9 b. The board shall have access to, and shall review the 10 sex offender registry information under section 692A.121 11 available to the general public, information in the Iowa court 12 information system available to the general public, the central 13 registry for child abuse information established under chapter 14 235A , and the dependent adult abuse records maintained under 15 chapter 235B for information regarding applicants for license 16 renewal and, every five years, for practitioners who are not 17 subject to renewal requirements pursuant to subsection 1 , 18 paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (2). The board may charge such 19 a practitioner who is not subject to renewal requirements a 20 reasonable fee for the review of the sex offender registry 21 information, information in the Iowa court information system, 22 the central registry for child abuse information, and the 23 dependent adult abuse records. 24 c. (1) The board shall require all initial applicants for 25 licensure, including individuals who apply for a license under 26 section 256.152, and all applicants for license renewal, to 27 produce evidence of the applicantâs lawful presence in the 28 United States as a condition of initial licensure or license 29 renewal. The board shall accept as proof of an applicantâs 30 lawful presence any of the following: 31 (a) A document that establishes both employment 32 authorization and identity, as described in 8 U.S.C. 33 Â§1324a(b)(1)(B). 34 (b) A document that evidences employment authorization, 35 -1- LSB 5046XC (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 S.F. _____ as described in 8 U.S.C. Â§1324a(b)(1)(C), and a document that 1 establishes the identity of the applicant, as described in 8 2 U.S.C. Â§1324a(b)(1)(D). 3 (2) The board shall require all practitioners who are not 4 subject to renewal requirements pursuant to subsection 1, 5 paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (2), to produce evidence of the 6 practitionerâs lawful presence in the United States every five 7 years as a condition of remaining licensed. The board shall 8 accept as proof of a practitionerâs lawful presence any of the 9 following: 10 (a) A document that establishes both employment 11 authorization and identity, as described in 8 U.S.C. 12 Â§1324a(b)(1)(B). 13 (b) A document that evidences employment authorization, 14 as described in 8 U.S.C. Â§1324a(b)(1)(C), and a document that 15 establishes the identity of the practitioner, as described in 8 16 U.S.C. Â§1324a(b)(1)(D). 17 Sec. 2. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 18 by adding the following new paragraph: 19 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0w. Be subject to and comply with the 20 requirements of section 280.37 relating to the verification of 21 the identity and employment eligibility of all individuals who 22 have accepted an offer of employment in the same manner as a 23 school district. 24 Sec. 3. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 25 by adding the following new paragraph: 26 NEW PARAGRAPH . v. Be subject to and comply with the 27 requirements of section 280.37 relating to the verification of 28 the identity and employment eligibility of all individuals who 29 have accepted an offer of employment in the same manner as a 30 school district. 31 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 280.37 Verification of identity and 32 eligibility to work in the United States. 33 The board of directors of each school district and the 34 authorities in charge of each accredited nonpublic school 35 -2- LSB 5046XC (2) 91 jda/jh 2/ 3 S.F. _____ shall verify the identity and employment eligibility of 1 all individuals who have accepted an offer of employment in 2 accordance with 8 U.S.C. Â§1324a. 3 Sec. 5. APPLICABILITY. The following applies to all 4 applications for initial licensure, and all applications for 5 license renewal, that are submitted to the board of educational 6 examiners on or after the effective date of this Act: 7 The section of this Act amending section 256.146. 8